Illinois, session 104th, HB1863.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the One 5Health Commission Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) The term "One Health" reflects the 9    interconnectedness of human health, animal health, and the 10    environment.11        (2) The strong connections and interdependency between 12    humans, companion animals, livestock, wildlife, and 13    ecosystem health are recognized in the One Health 14    Framework, which facilitates addressing zoonotic diseases, 15    vector-borne diseases, antimicrobial resistance, and other 16    complex, multidisciplinary issues. 17        (3) Existing One Health initiatives at the federal 18    level were included in both the 2021 Report of the 19    Appropriations Committee of the United States House of 20    Representatives and the 2023 Consolidated Appropriations 21    Act. Congress directed the Centers for Disease Control and 22    Prevention to collaborate with the U.S. Department of 23    Agriculture, U.S. Department of the Interior, and other   HB1863 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1    federal agency partners: 2            (A) to create a National One Health framework to 3        address zoonotic diseases and advance public health 4        preparedness in the United States; and5            (B) to collaborate with interagency partners on 6        the development of a One Health coordination mechanism 7        at the federal level to strengthen One Health 8        collaboration related to the prevention of, detection 9        of, control of, and response to zoonotic diseases and 10        related One Health work across the federal government. 11        (4) Existing One Health initiatives in other states 12    include the passage of Senate Bill 347 and Assembly Bill 13    1992 in New Jersey in June 2021 for the purpose of 14    developing a New Jersey One Health Commission.15        (5) Awareness and collaboration among disciplines will 16    help protect the environment and the health of all 17    species, will save lives in present and future 18    generations, and will improve the quality of life, the 19    physical and mental health, and the productivity of 20    residents of the State. 21        (6) A One Health approach recognizes that the health 22    of people is connected to the health of animals and the 23    environment, and it has been described as a collaborative, 24    multisector, and transdisciplinary approach, working at 25    the local, regional, national, and global levels, with the 26    goal of achieving optimal health outcomes while   HB1863 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1    recognizing the interconnection between people, animals, 2    plants, and their shared environment. 3        (7) A One Health approach is important because 4    approximately 60% of known infectious diseases in humans 5    and 75% of emerging infectious diseases originate from 6    animals; environmental factors, including climate change, 7    land-use changes, and biodiversity loss, significantly 8    influence the emergence and transmission of zoonotic 9    diseases. Animals can serve as early warning indicators of 10    potential public health threats, and robust agricultural 11    and environmental health systems are integral to public 12    health preparedness and response efforts.13        (8) It is, therefore, in the public interest for the 14    State to establish a One Health Commission to promote the 15    health and wellness of Illinois' natural resource, 16    residents, and animals, including pets, livestock, and 17    wildlife, by encouraging the collaborative efforts of 18    experts and leveraging knowledge and resources 19    effectively. 20    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:21    "One Health" means an integrated, unifying approach that 22aims to sustainably balance and optimize the health of people, 23animals, and ecosystems while recognizing that the health of 24humans, domestic and wild animals, plants, and the wider 25environment (including ecosystems) are closely linked and   HB1863 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1interdependent. 2    "Commission" means the One Health Commission established 3under this Act. 4    Section 15. One Health Commission. 5    (a) The One Health Commission is established in the 6Department of Public Health. The purpose of this Commission 7shall be to develop a strategic plan to promote 8interdisciplinary communication and collaboration between 9physicians, veterinarians, and other scientific professionals 10and State agencies, with the goal of promoting the health and 11well-being of the State's residents, animals, and environment. 12    (b) The goals and responsibilities of the Commission shall 13include: 14        (1) recommending the best practices to promote 15    interdisciplinary communication and collaboration between 16    human, animal, and environmental health professionals; 17        (2) establishing mechanisms to provide feedback on, 18    and to support State agency and local government responses 19    to, and recovery from, zoonotic disease outbreaks in 20    animals and humans; 21        (3) coordinating and collaborating with appropriate 22    entities to develop effective approaches to reduce hazards 23    to human, animal, and environmental health and ensuring 24    innovative, science-based solutions are integrated into 25    public health strategies;  HB1863 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1        (4) developing educational and outreach initiatives to 2    promote the One Health approach across State government 3    agencies, the State's academic and research institutions, 4    nongovernmental organizations, and private entities;5        (5) collaborating with disciplines for development of 6    effective xenosurveillance and other means of surveilling 7    emerging One Health-related threats; and8        (6) promoting and providing education concerning 9    judicious antibiotic use by physicians, veterinarians, and 10    agricultural health professionals, including 11    recommendations on use of antibiotic alternatives, such as 12    bacteriophage therapy.13    (c) The Commission shall partner with academic 14institutions and nongovernmental organizations in the State 15and consult with associations, organizations, and individuals 16who are knowledgeable about the One Health initiative. 17    (d) The Commission shall be composed of the following 18members: 19        (1) the Director of Public Health or the Director's 20    designee, who shall serve as co-chairperson; 21        (2) the President of the University of Illinois, or 22    the President's designee, who shall serve as 23    co-chairperson;24        (3) the Director of Agriculture or the Director's 25    designee;26        (4) the Director of the Environmental Protection   HB1863 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1    Agency or the Director's designee; 2        (5) the Director of the Illinois Emergency Management 3    Agency and Office of Homeland Security or the Director's 4    designee; 5        (6) the Chairman of the Illinois Housing Development 6    Authority or the Chairman's designee; 7        (7) the Director of Natural Resources or the 8    Director's designee; 9        (8) the Secretary of Transportation or the Secretary's 10    designee; 11        (9) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12    or the Director's designee, who shall serve as an ex 13    officio, nonvoting, advisory member; 14        (10) 4 members who are experts regarding One Health 15    from the academic or teaching community in this State, 16    appointed by the Director of Public Health; 17        (11) 2 members who are experts regarding One Health 18    and who are physicians licensed to practice medicine in 19    all its branches in this State, including at least one 20    with expertise in epidemiology or infectious disease 21    surveillance, appointed by the Director of Public Health;22        (12) 2 members who are experts regarding One Health 23    and who are veterinarians licensed in this State, 24    entomologists, or licensed environmental health 25    practitioners, appointed by the Director of Public Health; 26    and  HB1863 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1         (13) one member who represents a safety net medical 2    facility in the State of Illinois who has expertise in One 3    Health, appointed by the Director of Public Health.4    (e) The Commission shall convene and meet at the call of a 5co-chairperson and shall meet as frequently as necessary to 6carry out its duties as required by this Act. 7    (f) Members shall be appointed for 4-year terms.8    (g) The Department of Public Health and the University of 9Illinois shall provide administrative and other support to the 10Commission. 11    (h) The members of the Commission shall serve without 12compensation. 13    (i) The Commission shall submit a final report to the 14General Assembly and the Governor on or before January 1, 152028. This report shall:16        (1) outline the development of the One Health 17    Framework described in this Act;18        (2) provide details regarding the goals and 19    responsibilities of the Commission in this Act;20        (3) provide an assessment of One Health surveillance 21    and response systems; and22        (4) provide recommendations for future policy 23    enhancements any other recommendations for legislative or 24    regulatory action to improve, promote, and protect the 25    health and well-being of the State's residents, animals, 26    and environment.  HB1863 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 10416 BDA 20491 b1    The Commission shall provide an update to this report 2every 2 years.3    (j) The final report under subsection (i) shall be posted 4on the public websites of the State agencies listed in 5subsection (d) that participate in the Commission.